Missouri, session 2026, SB837.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 67, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 67.105, to read as
follows:
67.105. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, all proposals submitted to the voters for approval
after August 28, 2026, for the purpose of levying a new tax,
license, or fee, or renewing or increasing the current levy
of an existing tax, license, or fee, shall be submitted by
the governing body of the political subdivision on a general
election day or primary election day.
✓